Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1216
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Relocation Assistance Act, the definitions found in sections 76-1217 to 76-1227 shall apply.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 3.